Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Article 5. Acquisition of Abandoned Lots in Cities and Certain Towns.

§ 57-39.2.
Reversion of unoccupied cemetery lots in cities and certain towns; rebuttable presumption.

The ownership of or right or interest in any unoccupied cemetery lot in any cemetery located in any city or in any town in the Counties of Scott and Wythe, or in any town in any county having the urban county executive form of government, which cemetery is under the ownership and charge of such city or town, or any corporation, association, or trustees, shall, upon abandonment, revert to such city, town, corporation, association, or trustees having ownership and charge of the cemetery containing any such lot. The continued failure to maintain or care for an unoccupied cemetery lot for a period of at least 30 years shall establish a rebuttable presumption that such lot has been abandoned.

History.

1962, c. 264; §§

57-39.2

through

57-39.7

, 1964, c. 111; 1985, c. 414; 1986, c. 118; 1985, c. 414; 2020, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

This article, providing for the acquisition of abandoned cemetery lots by the city, corporation, association or trustees owning the cemetery, and applicable only in cities having a population in excess of 180,000 but not exceeding 300,000, was added to the Code by chapter 264 of the Acts of 1962. In furtherance of the general policy of the Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application, this article, which is limited in its purpose and scope, is not set out here, but attention is called to it by this reference.

Attention is likewise called to Chapter 111 of the Acts of 1964, which amended §§

57-39.2

through

57-39.7

, so as to make them also applicable to any town in any county which county has a population of not less than 21,950 nor more than 22,100; Acts 1985, c. 414, which amended §

57-39.2

to make this article applicable to any city with a population in excess of 180,000 or any town in any county having a population of not less than 24,500 nor more than 25,600, or having the urban county executive form of government, and amended §

57-39.7

to delete a reference to annual care; and Acts 1986, c. 118, which amended §

57-39.2

, so as to make this article applicable to any city, the article having formerly been applicable to cities having a population in excess of 180,000, and amended §

57-39.3

so as to provide for filing of a bill in equity in the circuit court, such bills formerly having been filed in the circuit, corporation or city court.

This section was formerly “Not set out” in furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application.

Acts 2020, c. 669 substituted “Cities and Certain Towns” for “Certain Cities” in the Article 5 heading.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 669, in the first sentence, substituted “the Counties of Scott and Wythe” for “any county, which county has a population of not less than 24,500 nor more than 25,600”; and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “The continued failure to maintain or care for an unoccupied cemetery lot in any cemetery for a period of at least thirty years, whether such period shall have elapsed prior to the effective date hereof or subsequent thereto, shall create and establish a rebuttable presumption that the same has been abandoned.”

§ 57-39.3.
Proceedings; determination of abandonment.

Any city, town, corporation, association, or trustees having ownership and charge of a cemetery that is located in a city, or town in a county, as provided in §

57-39.2

, may file a petition in the circuit court within whose jurisdiction the cemetery is situated, setting forth its ownership of the cemetery and facts relating to the continued failure by the owner of an unoccupied cemetery lot in such cemetery to maintain and care for such lot for at least 30 consecutive years immediately preceding, and requesting an order adjudging any such lot to be abandoned. Upon the filing of such petition, the court upon proper motion shall set a date for a hearing.

History.

1962, c. 264; 1964, c. 111; 1986, c. 118; 2020, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

This section was formerly “Not set out” in furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 669 rewrote the section, which read: “Any city, town, corporation, association, or trustees having ownership and charge of a cemetery which is located in a city, or town in a county, as provided in the preceding section (§

57-39.2

), may file a verified bill in equity in the circuit court having equity jurisdiction within whose jurisdiction the cemetery is situated, setting forth its or their ownership of the cemetery and facts relating to the continued failure by the owner of an unoccupied cemetery lot in such cemetery to maintain and care for the same for at least thirty consecutive years immediately preceding thereto, and pray for an order adjudging any such lot to be abandoned. Upon the filing of such bill, the court upon proper motion shall set a date for a hearing thereon.”

§ 57-39.4.
Notice to owner of record; publication.

At least 20 days before the date fixed for the hearing, a notice declaring that the unoccupied cemetery lot has been presumed to be abandoned and setting forth the date fixed for the hearing shall be (i)(a) served personally upon the recorded owner thereof, or his heirs, if the recorded owner is known by the cemetery to be dead and upon such heirs whose names and addresses have been filed with the cemetery, or (b) served by mailing the notice by registered mail to the last known address of the recorded owner thereof, or his heirs, if the recorded owner is known by the cemetery to be dead and to such heirs whose names and addresses have been filed with the cemetery, and (ii) published once a week for four consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the city or town in which the cemetery is located. It shall be the duty of such recorded owner or his heirs to appear and answer to the allegations of a petition filed pursuant to §

57-39.3

. Any such appearance and answer shall rebut the presumption of abandonment.

History.

1962, c. 264; 1964, c. 111; 2020, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

This section was formerly “Not set out” in furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 669, in the first sentence, substituted “At least 20” for “Not less than twenty” and made stylistic changes; and rewrote the last sentence, which read: “Thereupon, it shall be the duty of such recorded owner or his heirs, as the case may be, to appear and make answer to the allegations of said bill and any such appearance and answer shall rebut the presumption of abandonment.”

§ 57-39.5.
Judicial determination; conveyance of title.

At the hearing authorized by §

57-39.4

, the proofs of the parties or the petition in the event of the failure of the recorded owner or his heirs to appear and answer shall be presented, and the court shall determine if the unoccupied cemetery lot set forth in the petition has been abandoned. If the court enters a decree adjudging such lot to be abandoned, it shall further provide that the city, town, corporation, association, or trustees having ownership and charge of the cemetery containing any such lot shall have the right to sell such lot and to use the proceeds for the purposes provided by this article.

History.

1962, c. 264; 1964, c. 111; 2020, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

This section was formerly “Not set out” in furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 669 rewrote the section, which read: “At the hearing authorized by the preceding section, the proofs of the parties shall be presented and if the court shall determine therefrom, or upon the verified bill in event of the failure of the recorded owner or his heirs, as the case may be, to appear and answer, that the unoccupied cemetery lot set forth in the bill has been abandoned, the court shall enter a decree adjudging the same to be abandoned, and shall further provide that the city, town, corporation, association or trustees having ownership and charge of the cemetery containing any such lot shall have the right to sell the same, conveying good title thereto, and to use the proceeds derived therefrom in the manner and for the purposes hereinafter provided.”

§ 57-39.6.
Sale of abandoned cemetery lot.

At any time after entry of the decree adjudicating any unoccupied cemetery lot to be abandoned pursuant to §

57-39.5

, the city, town, corporation, association, or trustees having ownership and charge of the cemetery containing any such lot may sell such lot in accordance with the rules and regulations of the cemetery then in force governing generally the sale of cemetery lots. Any proceeds derived from this sale shall first be used to defray the costs and expenses incurred in any abandonment proceedings. Unless otherwise directed by the court, the remaining balance shall be placed in a special fund, known as the “Perpetual Care Fund” of the cemetery, to be used by the cemetery solely for the future maintenance, care, and upkeep of the cemetery.

History.

1962, c. 264; 1964, c. 111; 2020, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

This section was formerly “Not set out” in furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 669 rewrote the section, which read: “At any time after entry of the decree adjudicating any unoccupied cemetery lot to be abandoned, the city, town, corporation, association or trustees having ownership and charge of the cemetery containing any such lot may sell the same in accordance with the rules and regulations of the cemetery then in force governing generally the sale of cemetery lots. Any proceeds derived therefrom shall first be used to defray the costs and expenses incurred in any abandonment proceedings, and the balance thereof shall, unless otherwise directed by the court, be placed in a special fund, known as the ”Perpetual Care Fund“ of the cemetery, to be used by the cemetery solely for the future maintenance, care and upkeep of the cemetery.”

§ 57-39.7.
Applicability; abandonment determination limited in certain circumstances.

Sections

57-39.2

through 57.39.6 shall be construed to apply to and authorize a determination of abandonment of any unoccupied part of a cemetery lot. In any proceeding to determine the abandonment of an unoccupied part of a cemetery lot, the court shall also determine what part, if any, shall be considered as having been abandoned. Such sections shall not be construed to apply to and authorize a determination of abandonment of (i) that part of a cemetery lot wherein there has been an interment, (ii) any cemetery lot or part thereof to which unrestricted fee simple title has been conveyed by a cemetery, or (iii) any cemetery lot or part thereof for which perpetual care has been provided by contract with the city, town, corporation, association, or trustees having ownership and charge of the cemetery containing any such lot or part thereof.

History.

1962, c. 264; 1964, c. 111; 1985, c. 414; 2020, c. 669.

Editor’s note.

This section was formerly “Not set out” in furtherance of the general policy of the Virginia Code Commission to include in the Code only provisions having general and permanent application.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 669, in the second sentence, deleted “in the exercise of its equity jurisdiction” following “the court shall” and “the following” following “determination of abandonment of” and made stylistic changes.